Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Chapter 06. Acupuncture.

Cross references. —

For legislative purpose in enacting this chapter, see § 1, ch. 6, SLA 1990.

For provisions relating to needle stick and sharps injury protections, see AS

18.60.880

—

18.60.890

.

Administrative Code. —

For acupuncture, see 12 AAC 05.

Collateral references. —

Acupuncture as illegal practice of medicine, 72 ALR3d 1257.

Sec. 08.06.010.
Practice of acupuncture without license prohibited.

A person may not practice acupuncture without a license.

History.

(§ 2 ch 6 SLA 1990)

Sec. 08.06.020.
Application for license.

A person desiring to practice acupuncture shall apply in writing to the department.

History.

(§ 2 ch 6 SLA 1990)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, see 12 AAC 5, art. 1.

Sec. 08.06.030.
License to practice acupuncture.

A person is qualified to receive a license to practice acupuncture if the person

is of good moral character;

is at least 21 years of age;

either

has completed a course of study consistent with the core curriculum and guidelines of the Accreditation Commission for Acupuncture and Oriental Medicine at a school of acupuncture approved by the department; or

is licensed to practice acupuncture in another jurisdiction that has acupuncture licensing requirements equivalent to those of this state;

is qualified for certification by the National Certification Commission for Acupuncture and Oriental Medicine as a diplomate in acupuncture;

does not have a disciplinary proceeding or unresolved complaint pending at the time of application; and

has not had a license to practice acupuncture suspended or revoked in this state or in another jurisdiction.

The department shall issue a license to practice acupuncture to each person who is qualified and who pays the appropriate fee.

Each person licensed to practice acupuncture under this chapter shall display the license in a conspicuous place where the licensee practices.

History.

(§ 2 ch 6 SLA 1990; am § 7 ch 23 SLA 1995; am § 9 ch 21 SLA 2000)

Administrative Code. —

For occupational licensing fees, see 12 AAC 2, art. 2.

For licensing, see 12 AAC 5, art. 1.

Sec. 08.06.040.
Renewal of license.

The department may not renew a license under this chapter unless the applicant demonstrates continued competence as an acupuncturist in a manner established by the department in regulations.

History.

(§ 2 ch 6 SLA 1990; am § 6 ch 129 SLA 1992)

Administrative Code. —

For license renewal and continuing competency, see 12 AAC 5, art. 2.

Sec. 08.06.050.
Disclosure.

A person who practices acupuncture shall disclose that the person’s training and practice are in acupuncture

to each patient; and

on all material used in the practice of acupuncture and made available to patients or to the public.

A person who practices acupuncture without being covered by malpractice insurance shall disclose to each patient that the person does not have the insurance.

History.

(§ 2 ch 6 SLA 1990)

Administrative Code. —

For practice standards, see 12 AAC 5, art. 3.

Sec. 08.06.060.
Restrictions on practice of acupuncture.

A person who practices acupuncture may not

give, prescribe, or recommend in the practice a

prescription drug;

controlled substance;

poison;

engage in surgery; or

use the word “physician” in the person’s title unless the person is also licensed as a physician.

History.

(§ 2 ch 6 SLA 1990)

Sec. 08.06.070.
Grounds for imposition of disciplinary sanctions.

After a hearing, the department may impose a disciplinary sanction on a person licensed under this chapter when the department finds that the licensee

secured a license through deceit, fraud, or intentional misrepresentation;

engaged in deceit, fraud, or intentional misrepresentation in the course of providing professional services or engaging in professional activities;

advertised professional services in a false or misleading manner;

has been convicted of a felony or other crime that affects the licensee’s ability to continue to practice competently and safely;

intentionally or negligently engaged in patient care, or permitted the performance of patient care by persons under the licensee’s supervision, that does not conform to minimum professional standards regardless of whether actual injury to the patient occurred;

failed to comply with this chapter, with a regulation adopted under this chapter, or with an order of the department;

continued to practice after becoming unfit due to

professional incompetence;

failure to keep informed of current professional practices;

addiction to or severe dependency on alcohol or other drugs that impairs the ability to practice safely;

physical or mental disability; or

engaged in lewd or immoral conduct in connection with the delivery of professional service to patients.

History.

(§ 2 ch 6 SLA 1990)

Sec. 08.06.080.
Exemption.

This chapter does not apply to a person who practices acupuncture under AS 08.36 or AS 08.64.

History.

(§ 2 ch 6 SLA 1990)

Sec. 08.06.090.
Penalty.

A person who violates this chapter or a regulation adopted under this chapter is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 2 ch 6 SLA 1990)

Cross references. —

For penalties for misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.035

and

12.55.135

.

Sec. 08.06.100.
Regulations.

The department may adopt regulations to implement this chapter, including regulations establishing

standards for the practice of acupuncture;

standards for continuing education and training;

a code of ethics for the practice of acupuncture.

History.

(§ 2 ch 6 SLA 1990)

Administrative Code. —

For occupational licensing fees, see 12 AAC 2, art. 2.

For licensing, see 12 AAC 5, art. 1.

For license renewal and continuing competency, see 12 AAC 5, art. 2.

For practice standards, see 12 AAC 5, art. 3.

Sec. 08.06.190.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“acupuncture” means a form of healing developed from traditional Chinese medical concepts that uses the stimulation of certain points on or near the surface of the body by the insertion of needles to prevent or modify the perception of pain or to normalize physiological functions;

“department” means the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development;

“practice of acupuncture” means the insertion of sterile acupuncture needles and the application of moxibustion to specific areas of the human body based upon acupuncture diagnosis; the practice of acupuncture includes adjunctive therapies involving mechanical, thermal, electrical, and electromagnetic treatment and the recommendation of dietary guidelines and therapeutic exercise.

History.

(§ 2 ch 6 SLA 1990)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development” in paragraph (2), in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.